Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.090

Printing of bonds.

Where physical bonds are issued pursuant to RCW 36.73.070 or 36.73.080, the bonds shall be printed, engraved, or lithographed on good bond paper and the manual or facsimile signatures of both the treasurer and chairperson of the governing body shall be included on each bond.

[ 1987 c 327 s 9.]